Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska80-401.05
Comprehensive Health Insurance Pool; board of directors; Department of Insurance; duties.

The Board of Directors of the Comprehensive Health Insurance Pool and the Department of Insurance shall work closely with the Department of Veterans' Affairs to ensure the Veterans' Aid Income Fund and various federal benefits are utilized along with the Comprehensive Health Insurance Pool as resources for veterans and their families.

Laws 1992, LB 835, § 3.

Comprehensive Health Insurance Pool Act, see section 44-4201.